Idaho, session 2026, H0655.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-276, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-276. PRECEPTORS -- PRIOR AUTHORIZATION EXEMPTION. (1) A physician
practicing an eligible specialty who provides three hundred sixty (360)
hours or more of preceptorship in a calendar year, with at least sixty per-
cent (60%) of those hours occurring in a qualified rural area, shall qualify
for a twelve (12) month exemption from prior authorization requirements for
medically necessary services billed to Idaho medicaid plans.
(2)(a) A physician shall be responsible for tracking the physician's
preceptorship hours and may report such hours to the department of
health and welfare upon reaching the minimum amount of hours needed to
qualify for the exemption described in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The department of health and welfare shall verify the hours sub-
mitted by a physician, and upon verification shall exempt the physician
from prior authorization requirements as described in subsection (1) of
this section at the start of the next calendar year.
(3) The department of health and welfare may rescind an exemption from
prior authorization requirements if:
(a) On the basis of a review of a random sample of a statistically sig-
nificant number of claims submitted by a physician during an exempted
period, the department determines that the physician has fallen below
the acceptable risk-weighted claim sampling score. Such a review may
not be conducted more than once per year; and
(b) The department notifies the physician at least twenty-five (25)
days before the proposed rescinding from exemption is to take effect.
(4) No more than one hundred (100) physicians from each eligible spe-
cialty shall receive an exemption from prior authorization requirements
pursuant to this section per year.
(5) The department shall promulgate rules, subject to legislative ap-
proval, to carry out the provisions of this section, including the develop-
ment of a risk-weighted sampling methodology and scoring system that incor-
porates both the number and dollar amount of claims.
(6) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:


(a) "Eligible specialty" means primary care, psychiatry, or obstetrics
and gynecology.
(b) "Graduate student" means an individual matriculating at the gradu-
ate level at any accredited Idaho institution of higher education seek-
ing a degree in any of the areas of doctor of osteopathy or physician as-
sistant.
(c) "Preceptorship" means an uncompensated mentoring experience in
which a preceptor provides a program of personalized instruction,
training, and supervision that is offered to eligible graduate students
to enable the students to obtain professional degrees in primary care
fields.
(d) "Qualified rural area" means a primary care health professional
shortage area or a medically underserved area, as those terms are de-
fined in section 39-5903, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.